Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-19,171
Report of indemnification to members.

If a corporation indemnifies or advances expenses to a director under section 21-1997, 21-1998, 21-1999, or 21-19,100 in connection with a proceeding by or in the right of the corporation, the corporation shall report the indemnification or advance in writing to the members with or before the notice of the next meeting of members.

Laws 1996, LB 681, § 171.